Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1760XC (2) 91 ll/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 562A.6, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. âRentâ means a payment to be made to the landlord under 3 the rental agreement , including base rent, utilities, late 4 fees, and other payments made by the tenant to the landlord 5 under the rental agreement . 6 Sec. 2. Section 562A.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 2. Notice served by mail under this section is deemed 9 completed four days after the notice is deposited in the mail 10 and postmarked for delivery, whether or not the recipient signs 11 a receipt for the notice. In computing the time for completion 12 of service, the first day shall be excluded and the final day 13 shall be included regardless of whether the fourth day is a 14 Saturday, Sunday, or federal holiday. 15 Sec. 3. Section 562A.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 3. A provision prohibited by this section included in a 18 rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord willfully 19 uses enforces a provision in a rental agreement containing 20 provisions known by the landlord to be prohibited, a tenant may 21 recover actual damages sustained by the tenant and not more 22 than three monthsâ periodic rent and reasonable attorney fees. 23 Sec. 4. Section 562A.29A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 c. Posting on the primary entrance door of the dwelling 26 unit and mailing by both regular mail and certified mail, as 27 defined in section 618.15 , to the address of the dwelling 28 unit or to the tenantâs last known address, if different from 29 the address of the dwelling unit. A notice posted according 30 to this paragraph shall be posted within the applicable time 31 period for serving notice and shall include the date the notice 32 was posted. A notice delivered under this paragraph that is 33 addressed to all tenants and unknown parties in possession 34 shall be deemed to provide notice to all tenants, occupants, 35 -1- LSB 1760XC (2) 91 ll/jh 1/ 6 S.F. _____ and parties in possession of the premises. 1 Sec. 5. Section 562B.9, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. Notice served by mail under this section is deemed 4 completed four days after the notice is deposited in the mail 5 and postmarked for delivery, whether or not the recipient signs 6 a receipt for the notice. In computing the time for completion 7 of service, the first day shall be excluded and the final day 8 shall be included regardless of whether the fourth day is a 9 Saturday, Sunday, or federal holiday. 10 Sec. 6. Section 562B.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 3. A provision prohibited by this section included in a 13 rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord or tenant 14 knowingly uses enforces a provision in a rental agreement 15 containing provisions known to be prohibited by this chapter , 16 the other party may recover actual damages sustained. 17 Sec. 7. Section 562B.20, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 1. A landlord shall not have the right of access to a mobile 20 home owned by a tenant unless such access is necessary to 21 prevent damage to the mobile home space , or is in response to 22 an emergency situation , or after entry of an order of removal 23 of the tenant, is for the purpose of making safe the mobile 24 home or mobile home space, including securing or winterizing 25 the mobile home or mobile home space . 26 Sec. 8. Section 562B.27A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 27 2025, is amended to read as follows: 28 c. Posting on the primary entrance door of the dwelling 29 unit and mailing by both regular mail and certified mail, as 30 defined in section 618.15 , to the address of the dwelling 31 unit or to the tenantâs last known address, if different from 32 the address of the dwelling unit. A notice posted according 33 to this paragraph shall be posted within the applicable time 34 period for serving notice and shall include the date the notice 35 -2- LSB 1760XC (2) 91 ll/jh 2/ 6 S.F. _____ was posted. A notice delivered under this paragraph that is 1 addressed to all tenants and unknown parties in possession 2 shall be deemed to provide notice to all tenants, occupants, 3 and parties in possession of the premises. 4 Sec. 9. Section 648.3, subsection 2, paragraphs a and c, 5 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 6 a. Delivery evidenced by an acknowledgment of delivery that 7 is signed and dated by a resident of the premises who is at 8 least eighteen years of age. Delivery A notice delivered under 9 this paragraph that is addressed to all tenants and unknown 10 parties in possession shall be deemed to provide notice to the 11 defendant all tenants, occupants, and parties in possession of 12 the premises . 13 c. Posting on the primary entrance door of the premises and 14 mailing by both regular mail and certified mail, as defined 15 in section 618.15 , to the address of the premises or to the 16 defendantâs last known address, if different from the address 17 of the premises. A notice posted according to this paragraph 18 shall be posted within the applicable time period for serving 19 notice and shall include the date the notice was posted. A 20 notice delivered under this paragraph that is addressed to 21 all tenants and unknown parties in possession shall be deemed 22 to provide notice to all tenants, occupants, and parties in 23 possession of the premises. 24 Sec. 10. Section 648.5, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 25 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 c. If service cannot be made following two attempts using 27 a method specified under paragraph âaâ or âbâ , by posting on 28 the primary entrance door of the premises and mailing by both 29 regular mail and certified mail, as defined in section 618.15 , 30 to the address of the premises or to the defendantâs last known 31 address, if different from the address of the premises. An 32 original notice posted according to this paragraph shall be 33 posted not less than three days prior to the hearing and shall 34 include the date the original notice was posted. Service of 35 -3- LSB 1760XC (2) 91 ll/jh 3/ 6 S.F. _____ original notice by mailing shall occur not less than three days 1 prior to the hearing , but may otherwise occur prior to the two 2 attempts using a method specified under paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 3 Sec. 11. Section 648.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 648.18 Possession ââ bar. 6 Thirty Ninety daysâ peaceable possession with the knowledge 7 of the plaintiff after the cause of action accrues is a bar to 8 this proceeding. 9 Sec. 12. Section 648.22, Code 2025, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 648.22 Judgment ââ execution ââ costs. 12 1. If the defendant is found guilty, judgment shall be 13 entered that the defendant be removed from the premises, and 14 that the plaintiff be put in possession of the premises, and 15 an execution for the defendantâs removal within three days 16 from the judgment shall issue accordingly, to which shall be 17 added a clause commanding the officer to collect the costs as 18 in ordinary cases. 19 2. Any personal property of the defendant remaining on the 20 premises after the defendantâs removal under this section may 21 be immediately disposed of by the plaintiff. Personal property 22 under this subsection does not include a mobile home as defined 23 in section 562B.7, or the contents therein, unless the mobile 24 home is the premises. 25